Utah statutes.
76-8-416.   Taking toll or maintaining road, bridge, or ferry without authority -- Refusal to pay lawful toll.

Any person who demands or receives compensation for the use of any bridge or ferry, or who sets up or keeps any road, bridge, or ferry, or constructed ford, for the purpose of receiving remuneration for its use without authority of law; and any person who refuses to pay on demand the compensation or fee authorized to be collected for use of a licensed toll road, bridge, ferry, or constructed ford after having used it is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

